Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-303
Right-of-way; abandonment, effect of.

If any pole line or underground line constructed under section 70-301 be abandoned for a period of five years, the right-of-way or easement acquired for its construction shall revert to the owner of the property affected.

Laws 1927, c. 107, § 1, p. 295;

C.S.1929, § 70-401;

R.S.1943, § 70-303;

Laws 1963, c. 394, § 1, p. 1252;

Laws 1969, c. 545, § 2, p. 2200.